Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-407
Exemptions.

Sections
69-401 to 69-409 do not apply to:

(1) Purchases of regulated metals property from a manufacturing, industrial,
or other commercial vendor that generates or sells regulated metals property
in the ordinary course of its business;

(2) The collection or purchase of regulated metals property in the form
of beverage or food cans; or

(3) Recycling or neighborhood cleanup programs contracted or sponsored
by the state or any political subdivision.

Laws 2008, LB766, § 7;

Laws 2012, LB1049, § 4.